Tennessee, session 114, SB1785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-393(j), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (3):
(3) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the retail sale of food
and food ingredients if sold between 12:01 a.m. on July 1, 2026, and 11:59 p.m. on
September 30, 2026, to a person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older. This
subdivision (j)(3) does not exempt sales from a micro market or vending machine or
device.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1785
009121
- 1 -